Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,230
Forcible entry and detainer; restitution; writ of execution; form.

If a judgment of restitution is entered, the court shall, at the request of the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, issue a writ of execution thereon which shall be in the following form as nearly as practicable:

The State of Nebraska, ................ County, ss.

To any Constable or Sheriff of ................ County:

Whereas, in a certain action for the forcible entry and detention, (or the forcible detention, as the case may be) of the following described premises, to wit: .................., lately tried before this court, wherein ................... was plaintiff, and ............. was defendant, judgment was entered on the ....... day of .......... A.D. ........, you therefor are hereby commanded to cause the defendant to be forthwith removed from the premises, and the plaintiff to have restitution of the same; also that you levy of the goods and chattels of the defendant, and make the costs aforesaid, and all accruing costs; and of this writ make legal service and due return. Witness my hand this ...... day of ......... A.D. ......, Clerk of the (County or District) Court.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 129, p. 312;

C.S.1929, § 22-1213;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,130;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 80;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-580;

Laws 2000, LB 921, § 24;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 11.